Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-315 Banks, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, and financial services loan companies. (a)
An insurer may invest or deposit any of its funds in checking or savings
accounts, under separate certificates of deposit, or in any other form in
solvent banks or trust companies.

(b) An insurer may invest any of its funds in
shares or savings accounts in solvent savings and loan associations that are
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(c) An insurer may deposit any of its funds in
shares or share draft accounts in solvent state chartered credit unions or
federally chartered credit unions.

(d) An insurer may invest or deposit any of
its funds in savings accounts, in certificates of deposit, or in any other form
in solvent financial services loan companies that are insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 107, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next